Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 353.060 is amended to read:
353.060. (1) The Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors shall appoint a
president of the university.
(2) Except in the case of an interim or acting president, the hiring committee for  the
president of the  university shall include representatives of the university community and at
least one president of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(3) The president is  the president of the faculty and is the executive and governing officer of
the university. Subject  to the supervision of the board, the president has authority to direct the af-
fairs of the university.
SECTION 2.  ORS 353.050 is amended to read:
353.050. Except as  otherwise provided in this chapter, the Oregon Health and Science University
Board of Directors, or university officials acting under  the authority of the board, shall exercise all
the powers  of the Oregon Health and Science University and shall govern the university. In carrying
out its powers, rights and privileges, the  university shall be a governmental entity performing gov-
ernmental functions and exercising governmental powers. The university or  the board may either
within or outside the state:
(1) Determine or approve policies for the organization, administration and  development of the
university.
(2) Appoint and employ any instructional, administrative, professional, trade,  occupational and
other personnel as are necessary or appropriate to carry out the missions of the  university, and
prescribe their compensation and terms of office or employment.
(3) Make any and all contracts and agreements,  enter into any partnership, joint venture or
other business arrangement, create and participate fully in the operation of any business structure,
including but not limited to the development of  business structures for health care delivery systems
and networks with any public or private  government, nonprofit or for-profit person or entity that in
the judgment of the university or the board is necessary or appropriate to carry  out the university’s
missions and goals.
(4) Acquire,  purchase, receive, hold, control, convey, sell, manage, operate, lease, license, lend,
invest, improve, develop, use, dispose of  and hold title to real and personal property of any nature,
including intellectual property, in its own name.
Enrolled House Bill 2695 (HB 2695-INTRO) Page 1
(5) Sue in its  own name and be sued, plead and be impleaded in all actions, suits or proceedings
in any forum brought by or against it by any and all private or state, local, federal or other  public
entities, agencies or persons.
(6) Encourage gifts and donations for the benefit of the university, and subject to the  terms of
the gift, retain, invest and use such gifts as deemed appropriate by the university or the board.
(7) Acquire, receive, hold, keep, pledge, control, convey, manage, use, lend, expend  and invest
all funds, appropriations, gifts, bequests, stock and revenue from any source to the university.
(8) Borrow money for the needs of the  university, in such amounts and for such time and upon
such terms as may be determined by the university or the board.
(9) Erect, construct, improve, develop,  repair, maintain, equip, furnish, lease, lend, convey, sell,
manage, operate, use, dispose of and hold title to buildings, structures and lands for the university.
(10) Purchase any and  all insurance, operate a self-insurance program or otherwise arrange for
the equivalent of insurance coverage of any nature and  the indemnity and defense of its officers,
agents and employees or other persons designated by the university to carry out or further  the
missions of the university.
(11) Create, develop, supervise, control and  adopt academic programs, including standards,
qualifications, policies or practices relating to admissions, curriculum, academic  advancement,
grading policy,  student conduct, credits and scholarships and the granting of academic degrees,
certificates and other forms of recognition.
(12) Authorize, create, eliminate, establish, operate, reorganize, reduce  or expand any program,
school, institute, health care facility or other unit of operation.
(13) Establish, charge, collect and use charges  for enrollment into the university, including
charges such as tuition  for education and general services, incidental fees and such other charges
found by the university to be  necessary to carry out its educational programs. Fees realized in ex-
cess of amounts allocated  and exceeding required reserves shall be considered surplus incidental
fees and shall be allocated for programs under the control of the board and found to be  advanta-
geous to  the cultural or physical development of students of the university upon the recommendation
of the recognized student government of the university.
(14) Establish, charge, collect and use charges and fees for university services and the use of
university facilities.
(15) Impose charges, fines, fees and such other regulations considered convenient  or necessary
to control and regulate traffic and parking of vehicles to  the same extent allowed governing boards
of public universities listed in ORS 352.002. This authority  includes the authority to enforce the
regulations of the university in a court to the extent allowed the governing board of a  public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002 in ORS 352.118.
(16) Enforce  and recover for payment to the university any fines that are authorized by this
chapter.
(17) Adopt,  amend or repeal bylaws, administrative rules, regulations and orders applicable to
the matters that are the subject of this chapter.
(18) Contract with any state agency for the performance of such duties, functions and  powers
as is appropriate. A  state agency shall not charge the university for such services an amount that
is greater than the actual cost of the services.
(19) Purchase, receive,  subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage,
lend, pledge, invest in or otherwise dispose of and deal in or with the shares, stock or other  equity
or interests in or obligations of any other entity. Separate funds may be established for such in-
vestments. The State of Oregon shall have no proprietary or other interest in such investments or
such funds.
(20) Make available, by lease or otherwise, or control access to any health care facilities  or
services or other of its properties  and assets to such persons, firms, partnerships, associations or
corporations and on such terms as considered appropriate, charge and collect rent or  other fees or
charges therefor and  terminate or deny any such access or any such lease or other agreement for
Enrolled House Bill 2695 (HB 2695-INTRO) Page 2
such reasons as  considered appropriate and as may be consistent with its obligations under any such
lease or other agreement.
(21) Contract for the operation of any department, section, equipment or holdings of the uni-
versity and enter into any agreements with any person, firm or corporation for the management  by
said person, firm or  corporation on behalf of the university of any of its properties or for the more
efficient or economical performance of clerical, accounting, administrative and  other functions re-
lating to its health care facilities.
(22) Select and appoint faculty  as medical and dental staff members and others licensed to
practice the healing arts, delineate  and define the privileges granted each such individual, adopt and
direct a plan for faculty clinical  income and set the terms and conditions of that plan (including
such modifications to any such existing plan as considered necessary  or appropriate upon expiration
of the term of such plan), and determine the extent to which and the terms upon which  each such
individual may provide teaching, research, consulting or other services at the  university or any
other health care facility.
(23) Enter into affiliation, cooperation, territorial, management or  other similar agreements with
other public or private universities or health care providers for  the sharing, division, allocation or
furnishing of services on an exclusive or a nonexclusive basis, referral of  patients, management of
facilities, formation of health care delivery systems and other similar activities.
(24) Perform  any other acts that in the judgment of the board or university are requisite, nec-
essary or appropriate in  accomplishing the purposes described in or carrying out the powers granted
by this chapter.
(25) Exercise these powers, notwithstanding that as a consequence of the exercise of such pow-
ers, the university engages in activities that might otherwise be  deemed anticompetitive within the
contemplation of state or federal antitrust laws.
(26) Require the inclusion of at least  one faculty member, one nonfaculty staff member
and one member of the student body as part of a presidential search committee.
(27) Allow a representative from official  campus labor organizations to provide comments
or report to the governing board at  regularly scheduled meetings of the governing board if
the representative has  requested the opportunity to provide comments or report to the board
in advance of the meeting.
Enrolled House Bill 2695 (HB 2695-INTRO) Page 3
Passed by House April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2695 (HB 2695-INTRO) Page 4